California, session 20252026, AB2071.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. (a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Artificial intelligence” has the same meaning as defined in Section 33328.5 of the Education Code.(2) “Digital wellness” means a state of well-being in which an individual uses technology in ways that support physical health, mental health, social connections, and overall quality of life, while minimizing potential harms.(3) “Media literacy” means the ability to access, analyze, evaluate, create, and act using all forms of communication, including understanding how media messages are constructed, for what purposes, and with what effects.(b) (1) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(A) Digital technology and artificial intelligence are increasingly integral to the daily lives, social interactions, and learning experiences of California’s youth.(B) Excessive or inappropriate use of digital media, social media platforms, and artificial intelligence-powered technologies can negatively impact mental health, contributing to anxiety, depression, sleep disorders, attention difficulties, body image issues, social isolation, and suicidal ideation.(C) Youth face unique digital challenges, including cyberbullying, online harassment, exposure to harmful content, privacy violations, algorithmic manipulation, misinformation, and artificial intelligence-generated content that may be difficult to distinguish from reality.(D) Digital wellness education, including healthy technology use, critical media literacy, and understanding of artificial intelligence systems, is essential for youth to develop balanced relationships with technology and protect their mental and physical well-being.(E) The intersection of digital technology and mental health requires explicit educational intervention to help pupils develop skills for healthy digital citizenship, self-regulation, and critical thinking.(F) Education on digital wellness and media literacy complements and enhances mental health education by addressing a primary environmental factor affecting youth mental health in the 21st century.(2) For the reasons described in subdivision (b), it is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this act to ensure that pupils in middle school or elementary school, middle school, and high school have the opportunity to benefit from comprehensive education on digital wellness, media literacy, and the responsible use of emerging technologies, including artificial intelligence.SEC. 2. Section 51928 of the Education Code is amended to read:51928. For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:(a) “Age appropriate” has the same meaning as defined in Section 51931.(b) “Artificial intelligence” has the same meaning as defined in Section 33328.5.(c) “Digital wellness” means a state of well-being in which an individual uses technology in ways that support physical health, mental health, social connections, and overall quality of life, while minimizing potential harms.(d) “English learner” has the same meaning as defined in Section 51931.(e) “Evidence-based” means verified or supported by research conducted in compliance with scientific methods and published in peer-reviewed journals, where appropriate, and recognized as accurate and objective by professional organizations and agencies with expertise in the mental health field.SEC. 3. Section 51929 of the Education Code is amended to read:51929. (a) On or before January 1, 2024, the department shall develop a plan to expand mental health instruction in California public schools.(b) On or before January 1, 2028, the department shall develop a plan to expand digital wellness instruction in California public schools. This plan shall include all of the following:(1) Recommendations for age-appropriate curriculum frameworks instructional resources for middle schools elementary schools, middle schools, and high schools.(2) Strategies for keeping curriculum current with rapidly evolving digital and artificial intelligence technology.(3) Guidance for schools with limited technology resources.(4) Family engagement and education components.(5) Assessment methods for evaluating instruction effectiveness.(6) Strategies for ensuring adequate support and professional development opportunities for educators regarding digital wellness topics, including collaboration with technology companies, mental health organizations, and media literacy experts, as appropriate.